lucene/analysis/common/src/test/org/apache/lucene/analysis/hunspell/simple.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY abcdefghijklmopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ

SFX A Y 3
SFX A   0     e         n
SFX A   0     e         t
SFX A   0     e         h

SFX C Y 2
SFX C   0     d/C       c
SFX C   0     c         b

SFX D Y 1
SFX D   0     s         o

SFX E Y 1
SFX E   0     d         o

PFX B Y 1
PFX B   0     s         o
